Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1120.15
Director of Communications; powers,
duties, and responsibilities.

The Director of Communications
shall have the following powers, duties, and responsibilities:

(1) To provide the Legislature and the Governor technical assistance,
advice, and information concerning the financial and administrative operations
of the communications systems of all agencies of the state;

(2) To provide the Legislature and the Governor recommendations for
dealing with financial, management, and organizational problems affecting
the communications systems and services of the state, its departments and
agencies. The recommendations
submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically;

(3) To make inquiries of the agencies as to their communications charges
and prepare cost comparisons to insure that uniformity, efficiency, and equality
be achieved within the communications system;

(4) To make recommendations to the agencies pertaining to revisions
to internal systems as may be necessary to promote frugality and economy in
the communications system; and

(5) To provide services such as system review, system design, feasibility
studies, equipment reviews, and for long-range planning and management service
within the division of communications.

Laws 1975, LB 427, § 6;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 50;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 33;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 189.